Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,158
Effect of amendment.

(MBCA 10.09) An amendment
to the articles of incorporation does not affect a cause of action existing
against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation
is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the
corporation. An amendment changing a corporation's name does not abate a proceeding
brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 158.